Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.060

City manager—Authority.

The powers and duties of the city manager shall be:

(1) To have general supervision over the administrative affairs of the municipality;

(2) To appoint and remove at any time all department heads, officers, and employees of the city or town, except members of the council, and subject to the provisions of any applicable law, rule, or regulation relating to civil service: PROVIDED, That the council may provide for the appointment by the mayor, subject to confirmation by the council, of the city planning commission, and other advisory citizens' committees, commissions and boards advisory to the city council: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the city manager shall appoint the municipal judge to a term of four years, subject to confirmation by the council. The municipal judge may be removed only on conviction of malfeasance or misconduct in office, or because of physical or mental disability rendering him or her incapable of performing the duties of his or her office. The council may cause an audit to be made of any department or office of the city or town government and may select the persons to make it, without the advice or consent of the city manager;

(3) To attend all meetings of the council at which his or her attendance may be required by that body;

(4) To see that all laws and ordinances are faithfully executed, subject to the authority which the council may grant the mayor to maintain law and order in times of emergency;

(5) To recommend for adoption by the council such measures as he or she may deem necessary or expedient;

(6) To prepare and submit to the council such reports as may be required by that body or as he or she may deem it advisable to submit;

(7) To keep the council fully advised of the financial condition of the city or town and its future needs;

(8) To prepare and submit to the council a tentative budget for the fiscal year;

(9) To perform such other duties as the council may determine by ordinance or resolution.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2022; 1987 c 3 s 5; 1965 ex.s. c 116 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.060. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 6; prior: (i) 1949 c 84 s 2, part; 1943 c 271 s 17, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-26, part. (ii) 1949 c 84 s 1; 1943 c 271 s 15; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-24. (iii) 1949 c 84 s 3, part; 1943 c 271 s 18, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-27, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.